Georgia, session 2025_26, HB146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 4 of Title 1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to holidays and
observances, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"1-4-27.
(a) The General Assembly hereby finds and determines that:
(1) The State of Georgia takes great pride in celebrating Black Women's History Month,
a celebration that is designed to recognize and applaud the achievements of African
American women;
(2) Generations of Black women throughout American history have used their
intelligence, imagination, sense of wonder, and tenacity to make extraordinary
H. B. 146
- 1 -

LC 47 3231
contributions to not only the State of Georgia, but also to the everyday means of how
Georgians live;
(3) The State of Georgia is home to many women of talent who represent a remarkable
range of accomplishments in a wide diversity of specialties, including the arts, literature,
film, and television; science and technology; news media; jurisprudence and government;
and education;
(4) These women's lives and works span the centuries of American history and come
from a variety of different cultural and ethnic backgrounds;
(5) The State of Georgia is proud to honor all women seeking to advance in all of the
important areas of life's work; and
(6) There is a need for public education, awareness, and discourse to address the impacts
Black women have had and continue to have on the State of Georgia and all its people.
(b) The month of April each year is designated as 'Black Women's History Month' in
Georgia.
(c) Officials and departments of state, county, and municipal governments, boards of
education, elementary and secondary schools, colleges and universities, businesses, and all
citizens are encouraged to participate in appropriate ceremonies, programs, and activities
that commemorate and honor the contributions of Black women throughout each April
during Black Women's History Month."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 146
- 2 -